California, session 20252026, AB293.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10724.2 is added to the Water Code, to read:10724.2. No later than January 1, 2026, each groundwater sustainability agency shall do both of the following:(a) Publish on its internet website or its local agency’s internet website the membership of its board of directors.(b) Publish on its internet website or its local agency’s internet website an electronic link to the location on the Fair Political Practices Commission’s internet website where the statements of economic interests, filed pursuant to Section 87200.5 of the Government Code by the members of the groundwater sustainability agency’s board of directors and executives, can be viewed.